Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB7.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Economic Development;
(b) "District" means a housing development district as described in this
section;
(c) "Local government" means a city, county, charter county government,
consolidated local government, urban-county government, or unified local
government;
(d) "Project" means a housing development within a housing development
district that contains at least twenty-five (25) housing units, which may
include multifamily housing, and that meets the requirements set out in this
section and any additional requirements adopted by a local government;
and
(e) "Taxing authority" means a school district and any special purpose
governmental entity with ad valorem taxing authority that operates within
the jurisdiction of a local government that has established a housing
development district as set out in this section;
(2) A local government may establish a housing development district by adopting an
ordinance containing:
(a) A map and a description of the area to be included within the district;
(b) A description of the process by which a developer may apply to construct
housing within the district;
(c) A statement regarding whether development within the district is exempt
from permitting or review by the planning unit or subject to alternative
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 350
procedures for permitting or review which shall be set out in the ordinance;
and
(d) Any additional requirements that the local government chooses to adopt
regarding the district, projects within the district, and qualifications that
developers must meet to be eligible for participation in the housing incentive
payment program set out in this section.
(3) If a local government chooses to utilize the exemption to planning and zoning or
alternative process in subsection (2)(c) of this section, it shall conduct a public
hearing regarding the exemption or alternative process and a separate vote of the
legislative body of the local government shall be required to adopt the exemption
or alternative process.
(4) Local governments may act jointly, via an interlocal agreement, to establish a
district. The interlocal agreement shall contain the information set out in
subsection (2) of this section, and each local government shall be required to
adopt an ordinance as set out in subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Any taxing authority may elect to participate in the housing incentive payment
program by having its board enact a resolution declaring its intent to participate.
(6) (a) Following the creation of a district, a local government may accept
applications from developers for a project.
(b) A local government shall have the sole discretion to approve or deny an
application, but a local government shall not approve a project unless it
determines that the project will not commence without its inclusion in the
district and access to the housing incentive payment program funds set out
in subsection (7) of this section.
(c) If a local government approves an application, it shall:
1. Negotiate with the developer to determine a percentage of the property
tax that will be used to calculate the housing incentive payment
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 350
described in subsection (7) of this section; and
2. After agreeing to a percentage, transmit the application along with a
document setting out the percentage of the property tax that will be
used to calculate the housing incentive payment to the cabinet.
(7) (a) Participating local governments and participating taxing authorities shall
each award a housing incentive payment to a developer of a project on an
annual basis for a period of five (5) years beginning six (6) months from the
commencement of the project. The annual housing incentive payment from
each participating local government and each participating taxing authority
shall be calculated by first determining the total property tax that would be
owed to all taxing districts for each home that is part of the qualifying
project within the district that has sold, using the first assessed value of
each property following its initial sale, and applying the percentage agreed
to by the participating local governments and the developer as set out in
subparagraph (6)(c)1. of this section.
(b) In a district established jointly as set out in subsection (4) of this section,
each local government shall pay a housing incentive payment to the
developer consistent with the distribution agreed to by the participating
local governments in the interlocal agreement.
(c) Any private or nonprofit entity may contribute money to a local government
to award as additional housing incentive payment amounts for a project
within a district.
(8) A local area development district shall, upon the request of a local government,
assist with the establishment of a district as set out in subsection (2) of this
section and with the administration of the housing incentive payment program as
set out in subsection (7) of this section.
(9) (a) The cabinet shall develop and implement strategies and programs to
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:22 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 350
promote awareness of the housing development district program and
housing incentive payment program set out in this section among
businesses or employers to whom they provide services or with whom they
conduct business.
(b) The cabinet shall provide a report to the Legislative Research Commission
on an annual basis regarding utilization of the housing development district
program that contains a summary of the information it has received in the
preceding year pursuant to subsection (6)(c)1. of this section.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:22 AM Jacketed